Idaho statutes. Title 40 HIGHWAYS AND BRIDGES
Chapter 27
COUNTY LOCAL OPTION SECONDARY HIGHWAY REORGANIZATION ACT

Sec.

§ 40-2701 — 40-2706. Regulation of secondary highways — Policy — Organization of county highway districts. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2707. Issuance of bonds prohibited. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2708. Adjustment of district borders — Notice — Hearing — Decision

Appeal. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2709. Authority and procedure for tax levies. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2710 — 40-2730. Apportionment of funds — Local option elections — Annexation of territory — Dissolution of districts. [Repealed.]

§ 40-2731 — 40-2733. Decennial county elections for new type of highway administration — Highway study commission — Meetings. [Repealed.]